Hawaii statutes.
[§21F-7] General purposes of analyst. (a)
The purpose of the office of the legislative analyst shall be:

(1) To provide the legislature with research and
analysis of current and projected state revenues and expenditures;

(2) To provide the legislature with a report
analyzing the governor's proposed levels of revenue and expenditures for
biennial budgets submitted under chapter 37 as well as other supplemental
budget submittals to the legislature by the governor;

(3) To provide an analysis of the impact of the
governor's proposed revenue and expenditure plans for the next biennium;

(4) To conduct research matters of economic and
fiscal policy and to report to the legislature on the result of the research;

(5) To provide economic reports and studies on the
state of the State's economy, including trends and forecasts for consideration
by the legislature;

(6) To conduct budget and tax studies and provide
general fiscal and budgetary information;

(7) To review and make recommendations on the
operation of state programs in order to appraise the implementation of state
laws regarding the expenditure of funds and to recommend means of improving
their efficiency; and

(8) To recommend to the legislature changes in the
mix of revenue sources for programs, in the percentage of state expenditures
devoted to major programs, and in the role of the legislature in overseeing
state government expenditures and revenue projections.

(b) In performing the duties under subsection
(a), the legislative analyst shall consider, among other things:

(1) The relative dependence on state tax revenues,
federal funds, and user fees to support state-funded programs, and whether the
existing mix of revenue sources is appropriate, given the purposes of the
programs;

(2) The relative percentages of state expenditures
that are devoted to major programs such as education, assistance to local
government, aid to individuals, state agencies and institutions, and debt
service; and

(3) The role of the legislature in overseeing state
government expenditures, including legislative appropriation of money from the
general fund, legislative appropriation of money from funds other than the
general fund, state agency receipt of money into revolving and other dedicated
funds and expenditure of money from these funds, and state agency expenditure
of federal funds. [L 1990, c 347, pt of §2]

Revision Note

Subsection (a) designation added.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next